North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-39.3 In Lieu of Sales Tax Fees [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 473, § 18]

57-39.3-01.
In lieu fee imposed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 473, § 18.

57-39.3-02.
Rate of in lieu fee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 473, § 18.

57-39.3-03.
Election to collect actual tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 473, § 18.

57-39.3-04.
Filing of returns and payment of tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 473, § 18.

57-39.3-05.
Administration. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 473, § 18.

57-39.3-06.
Distribution of revenues. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 473, § 18.